Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 4 Protection of Property of Persons Under Disability and Minors
§ 15-5-425. Distributive duties and powers of conservator.

A conservator may expend or distribute income or principal of the estate without court authorization or confirmation for the support, education, care or benefit of the protected person and his dependents in accordance with the following principles:

The conservator is to consider recommendations relating to the appropriate standard of support, education and benefit for the protected person made by a parent or guardian, if any. He may not be surcharged for sums paid to persons or organizations actually furnishing support, education or care to the protected person pursuant to the recommendations of a parent or guardian of the protected person, unless he knows that the parent or guardian is deriving personal financial benefit therefrom, including relief from any personal duty of support, or unless the recommendations are clearly not in the best interests of the protected person.

The conservator is to expend or distribute sums reasonably necessary for the support, education, care or benefit of the protected person with due regard to (A) the size of the estate, the probable duration of the conservatorship and the likelihood that the protected person, at some future time, may be fully able to manage his affairs and the estate which has been conserved for him; (B) the accustomed standard of living of the protected person and members of his household; (C) other funds or sources used for the support of the protected person.

The conservator may expend funds of the estate for the support of persons legally dependent on the protected person and others who are members of the protected person’s household who are unable to support themselves, and who are in need of support.

Funds expended under this subsection may be paid by the conservator to any person, including the protected person to reimburse for expenditures which the conservator might have made, or in advance for services to be rendered to the protected person when it is reasonable to expect that they will be performed and where advance payments are customary or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

A conservator, in discharging the responsibilities conferred by court order and this part, shall implement the principles described in section 15-5-408(a)[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

If the estate is ample to provide for the purposes implicit in the distributions authorized by the preceding subsections [subsection], a conservator for a protected person other than a minor has power to make gifts to charity and other objects as the protected person might have been expected to make, in amounts which do not exceed in total for any year twenty percent (20%) of the income from the estate.

When a minor who has not been adjudged disabled under subsection (b) of section 15-5-401[, Idaho Code,] of this part attains his majority, his conservator, after meeting all prior claims and expenses of administration, shall pay over and distribute all funds and properties to the former protected person as soon as possible.

When the conservator is satisfied that a protected person’s disability (other than minority) has ceased, the conservator, after meeting all prior claims and expenses of administration, shall pay over and distribute all funds and properties to the former protected person as soon as possible.

If a protected person dies, the conservator shall deliver to the court for safekeeping any will of the deceased protected person which may have come into his possession, inform the executor or a beneficiary named therein that he has done so, and retain the estate for delivery to a duly appointed personal representative of the decedent or other persons entitled thereto. If after forty (40) days from the death of the protected person no other person has been appointed personal representative and no application or petition for appointment is before the court, the conservator may apply to exercise the powers and duties of a personal representative so that he may proceed to administer and distribute the decedent’s estate without additional or further appointment. Upon application for an order granting the powers of a personal representative to a conservator, after notice to any person demanding notice under section 15-3-204[, Idaho Code,] of this code and to any person nominated executor in any will of which the applicant is aware, the court may order the conferral of the power upon determining that there is no objection, and indorse the letters of the conservator to note that the formerly protected person is deceased and that the conservator has acquired all of the powers and duties of a personal representative. The making and entry of an order under this section shall have the effect of an order of appointment of a personal representative as provided in section 15-3-308[, Idaho Code,] and parts 6 through 10 of chapter 3[, title 15, Idaho Code,] except that the estate in the name of the conservator, after administration, may be distributed to the decedent’s successors without prior re-transfer to the conservator as personal representative.
(f) During the period between the death of a protected person and the appointment of a personal representative for the protected person’s estate, or the conferral of the powers of a personal representative upon the conservator as provided in this section, the person acting as conservator at the time of the deceased protected person’s death shall have the duties and powers of a temporary conservator as set forth in section 15-5-407A, Idaho Code, and the powers set forth in section 54-1142(1)(j), Idaho Code.

§ 15-5-426. Enlargement or limitation of powers of conservator.

Subject to the restrictions in subsection (d) [paragraph (b)(4)] of section 15-5-408[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, the court may confer on a conservator at the time of appointment or later, in addition to the powers conferred on him by sections 15-5-424 and 15-5-425[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, any power which the court itself could exercise under subsection (b) and (c) [paragraphs (b)(2) and (b)(3)] of section 15-5-408[, Idaho Code,] of this Part. The court may, at the time of appointment or later, limit the powers of a conservator otherwise conferred by sections 15-5-424 and 15-5-425[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, or previously conferred by the court, and may at any time relieve him of any limitation. If the court limits any power conferred on the conservator by section 15-5-424[, Idaho Code,] or section 15-5-425[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, the limitation shall be indorsed upon his letters of appointment.

§ 15-5-427. Preservation of estate plan.

In investing the estate, and in selecting assets of the estate for distribution under subsections (a) and (b) of section 15-5-425[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, in utilizing powers of revocation or withdrawal available for the support of the protected person, and exercisable by the conservator or the court, the conservator and the court should take into account and preserve insofar as possible any known estate plan of the protected person, including his will, any revocable trust of which he is settlor, and any contract, transfer or joint ownership arrangement with provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at his death to another or others which he may have originated. The conservator may examine the will of the protected person.

§ 15-5-428. Claims against protected person — Enforcement.

A conservator must pay from the estate all just claims against the estate and against the protected person arising before or after the conservatorship upon their presentation and allowance. A claim may be presented by either of the following methods: (1) the claimant may deliver or mail to the conservator a written statement of the claim indicating its basis, the name and address of the claimant and the amount claimed; (2) the claimant may file a written statement of the claim, in the form prescribed by rule, with the clerk of the court and deliver or mail a copy of the statement to the conservator. A claim is deemed presented on the first to occur of receipt by the conservator of a written statement of claim or the filing with the court of the written statement of claim. A presented claim is allowed if it is not disallowed by written statement mailed by the conservator to the claimant within sixty (60) days after its presentation. The presentation of a claim tolls any statute of limitations relating to the claim until thirty (30) days after its disallowance.

A claimant whose claim has not been paid may petition the court for determination of his claim at any time before it is barred by the applicable statute of limitation, and, upon due proof, procure an order for its allowance and payment from the estate. If a proceeding is pending against a protected person at the time of appointment of a conservator or is initiated against the protected person thereafter, the moving party must give notice of the proceeding to the conservator if the outcome is to constitute a claim against the estate.

If it appears that the estate in conservatorship is likely to be exhausted before all existing claims are paid, preference is to be given to prior claims for the care, maintenance and education of the protected person or his dependents and existing claims for expenses of administration.

§ 15-5-429. Individual liability of conservator.

Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a conservator is not individually liable on a contract properly entered into in his fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless he fails to reveal his representative capacity and identify the estate in the contract.

The conservator is individually liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the estate or for torts committed in the course of administration of the estate only if he is personally at fault.

Claims based on contracts entered into by a conservator in his fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate, or on torts committed in the course of administration of the estate may be asserted against the estate by proceeding against the conservator in his fiduciary capacity, whether or not the conservator is individually liable therefor.

Any question of liability between the estate and the conservator individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge, or indemnification, or other appropriate proceeding or action.

§ 15-5-430. Termination of proceeding.

The protected person, his personal representative, the conservator, or any other interested person may petition the court to terminate the conservatorship. A protected person seeking termination is entitled to the same rights and procedure as in an original proceeding for a protective order. The court, upon determining after notice and hearing that the minority or disability of the protected person has ceased or that it would be in the best interests of the protected person to establish the conservatorship in another jurisdiction may terminate the conservatorship and, where appropriate, order initiation of proceedings in another jurisdiction or delivery of the assets to a foreign conservator as set forth in chapters 9, 10 and/or 11, title 15, Idaho Code. Upon termination, title to assets of the estate passes to the former protected person or to his successor subject to provision in the order for expenses of administration or to conveyances from the conservator to the former protected person or his successors, to evidence the transfer.

§ 15-5-431. Payment of debt and delivery of property to foreign conservator without local proceedings.

Any person indebted to a protected person, or having possession of property or of an instrument evidencing a debt, stock, or chose in action belonging to a protected person may pay or deliver to a conservator, guardian of the estate or other like fiduciary appointed by a court of the state of residence of the protected person, upon being presented with proof of his appointment and an affidavit made by him or on his behalf stating:

That no protective proceeding relating to the protected person is pending in this state, including any proceeding under chapters 9, 10 and/or 11, title 15, Idaho Code; and

That the foreign conservator is entitled to payment or to receive delivery.

If the person to whom the affidavit is presented is not aware of any protective proceeding pending in this state, payment or delivery in response to the demand and affidavit discharges the debtor or possessor.

§ 15-5-432. Powers or foreign conservator. [Repealed.]

§ 15-5-433. Provisions for conservator of minor from age eighteen to age twenty-one.

If so stated in the order appointing such conservator, or in any supplemental order entered prior to the time the minor reaches the age of eighteen (18) years, the conservator for a minor (said minor being hereinafter referred to as the “protected person”) shall act until the protected person reaches the age of twenty-one (21) years, subject to the following provisions:

The court may state in such order special terms and conditions for such conservator when acting while the protected person is of the age of eighteen (18) years or more, but less than the age of twenty-one (21) years;

Upon reaching the age of eighteen (18) years, the protected person may, at any time thereafter, petition the court to terminate or modify the conservatorship prior to the protected person attaining the age of twenty-one (21) years. Said petition must be based on the ability of the minor to adequately manage his or her own financial affairs, demonstrated by appropriate evidence, including:

Demonstrated ability to manage his or her financial affairs;

Submission of budgets and other appropriate similar documents;

Employment history;

Educational history;

Criminal history; and

Other relevant evidence;

The burden of showing such financial management ability shall be upon the protected person and must be demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence thereof; and

The court may, in its discretion, order reports to be filed by the conservator, and/or a court visitor, and/or may appoint a guardian ad litem for the protected person.

The original determination of whether to extend the conservatorship to age twenty-one (21) years shall be within the discretion of the court and may be based on such factors as the court deems to be relevant to such determination.

§ 15-5-434. Guardian ad litem — Duties.

Subject to the direction of the court, the guardian ad litem shall have the following duties, which shall continue until the resignation of the guardian ad litem or until the court removes the guardian ad litem or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever occurs first:

To conduct an independent factual investigation of the circumstances of the protected person including, without limitation, the circumstances described in the petition;

To file with the court a written report stating the results of the investigation, the guardian ad litem’s recommendations, and such other information as the court may require. The guardian ad litem’s written report shall be delivered to the court, with copies to all parties to the case, at least five (5) days before the date set for the adjudicatory hearing;

To act as an advocate for the protected person for whom appointed at each stage of the proceedings under this chapter and to be charged with the general representation of the protected person. To that end, the guardian ad litem shall participate fully in the proceedings to the degree necessary to adequately represent the protected person, and shall be entitled to confer with the protected person and the protected person’s immediate family including, but not limited to, spouse, parents, siblings, children and next of kin;

To facilitate and negotiate to ensure that the court, the department of health and welfare, if applicable, and the protected person’s attorney, if any, each fulfill their obligations to the protected person in a timely fashion;

To monitor the circumstances of a protected person, if the protected person is found to be within the purview of this chapter, to assure compliance with the law, and to assure that the terms of the court’s orders are being fulfilled and remain in the best interest of the protected person;

To meet any parent or other person having legal or physical custody of the protected person, record the concerns of the parent, and report them to the court or, if no such meeting occurs, file an affidavit stating why no meeting occurred;

To maintain all information regarding the case confidential and to not disclose such information except to the court or to other parties to the case;

To determine whether existing powers, trusts, and other measures may adequately give the protected person the legal protection otherwise provided by a conservator, or whether such powers, trusts or other measures could be reasonably created and, if so, to recommend that either no conservatorship be granted or that only a suitably limited conservatorship be granted; and

To exercise such other and further duties as may be expressly imposed by court order.

§ 15-5-435. Guardian ad litem — Rights and powers.

The guardian ad litem has the following rights and powers to fulfill the duties set forth in section 15-5-434, Idaho Code, which shall continue until the resignation of the guardian ad litem or until the court removes the guardian ad litem or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever occurs first.

The guardian ad litem shall have the right and power to file pleadings, motions, memoranda and briefs on behalf of the protected person, and to have all of the rights of the protected person, whether conferred by statute, rule of court, or otherwise.

All parties to any proceeding under this chapter shall promptly notify the guardian ad litem, and the conservator’s attorney, if any, of all hearings, staff hearings or meetings, investigations, depositions, and significant changes of circumstances of the protected person.

Except to the extent prohibited or regulated by federal law, upon presentation of a copy of the order appointing the guardian ad litem, any person or agency including, without limitation, any hospital, school organization, department of health and welfare, doctor, nurse or other health care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic, shall permit the guardian ad litem to inspect and copy pertinent records relating to the protected person necessary for the proceeding for which the guardian ad litem has been appointed.